Utah statutes.
23-13-11.   Violations.

Except as otherwise provided in this title:

(1)  a violation of any provision of this title is a class B misdemeanor; and

(2)  a violation of any rule or proclamation of the Wildlife Board is an infraction.



Amended by Chapter 347, 2009 General Session

